Montana, session 2025, HB236.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Examinations conducted at detention center or state prison. An
examination to determine a defendant's fitness to proceed as provided in 46-14-202 may be conducted at a
detention center or state prison that meets the requirements of [section 2].

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Requirements for detention centers and state prisons -- rulemaking
authority. (1) The department of public health and human services shall adopt rules to implement [section 1]
for a detention center or state prison to follow that reasonably adhere to a suitable facility to conduct an
examination to report on a defendant's mental condition. The rules must take into account:
(a) whether and how the defendant is to be segregated from or integrated with the general
population;
(b) whether the examination can be conducted at a behavioral health inpatient facility, and
providing rules for transport;
(c) what kind of food, clothing, schedule, and care is to be provided to the defendant;
(d) what kind of security and schedule is to be given to accommodate the mental health
professional conducting the examination;
(e) standards for the use of two-way electronic audio-video communication to conduct
examinations remotely; and
(f) standards to determine if a follow-up examination is needed at the state hospital.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 236

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 236.1
(2) The department of public health and human services shall adopt rules to implement the
qualification determination required by 46-14-202(1).

Section 3. Section 7-32-2222, MCA, is amended to read:
"7-32-2222. Health and safety of inmates. (1) Each detention center shall comply with state and
local fire codes for correctional occupancy and with sanitation, safety, and health codes.
(2) Designated exits must permit prompt evacuation of inmates and detention center staff in an
emergency.
(3) When there is good reason to believe that the inmates may be injured or endangered, the
detention center administrator shall remove them to a safe and convenient place and confine them there as
long as necessary to avoid the danger.
(4) Each detention center shall adopt a policy to allow for the evaluations provided for in [section
1]. The policy must not conflict with the rules adopted by the department of public health and human services
pursuant to [section 2]."

Section 4. Section 46-14-202, MCA, is amended to read:
"46-14-202. Examination of defendant. (1) If the defendant or the defendant's counsel files a written
motion requesting an examination or if the issue of the defendant's fitness to proceed is raised by the court,
prosecution, or defense counsel, the court shall appoint at least one qualified psychiatrist, licensed clinical
psychologist, or advanced practice registered nurse or shall request the superintendent of the Montana state
hospital to designate at least one qualified psychiatrist, licensed clinical psychologist, or advanced practice
registered nurse, who may be or include the superintendent, to examine and report upon on the defendant's
mental condition. Whether a psychiatrist, licensed clinical psychologist, or advanced practice registered nurse is
qualified to examine and report on the defendant's mental condition must be determined by the department of
public health and human services.
(2) The court may order the defendant to be committed to a hospital or other suitable facility, which
may include a detention center or state prison satisfying the requirements of [section 2], for the purpose of the
examination for a period not exceeding 60 days or a longer period that the court determines to be necessary for
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 236

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 236.1
the purpose and may direct that a qualified psychiatrist, licensed clinical psychologist, or advanced practice
registered nurse retained by the defendant be permitted to witness and participate in the examination.
(3) In the examination, any method may be employed that is accepted by the medical or
psychological profession for the examination of those alleged to be suffering from mental disease or disorder.
(4) (a) The costs incurred for an examination ordered under subsection (2) must be paid as
follows:
(i) if the issue of the defendant's fitness to proceed was raised by the court or the examination
was requested by the prosecution, the cost of the examination and other associated expenses must be paid by
the court or, in district court proceedings, by the office of court administrator, except as provided in subsection
(4)(a)(iv);
(ii) if the examination was requested by the defendant or the defendant's counsel, the cost of the
examination and other associated expenses must be paid by the defendant or, if the defendant was
represented by an attorney pursuant to the Montana Public Defender Act, Title 47, chapter 1, by the office of
state public defender, except as provided by subsection (4)(a)(iv);
(iii) if the examination was jointly requested by the prosecution and defense counsel or the need
for the examination was jointly agreed to by the prosecution and defense, the cost of the examination and other
associated expenses must be divided and paid equally by the court or, in district court proceedings, by the
office of court administrator, and the defendant or, if the defendant was represented by an attorney assigned
pursuant to the Montana Public Defender Act, Title 47, chapter 1, by the office of state public defender, except
as provided in subsection (4)(a)(iv);
(iv) any costs for an examination performed by an employee of the department of public health and
human services, any other associated expenses at a facility of the department of public health and human
services, and any other associated expenses for which the legislature has made a general fund appropriation to
the department of public health and human services may not be charged to the office of court administrator or
the office of state public defender.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection (4), "other associated expenses" means the following costs
incurred in association with the commitment to a hospital or other suitable facility for the purpose of
examination, regardless of whether the examination is done at the Montana state hospital or any other facility:
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 236

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 236.1
(i) the expenses of transporting the defendant from the place of detention to the place where the
examination is performed and returning the defendant to detention, including personnel costs of the law
enforcement agency by whom the defendant is detained;
(ii) housing expenses of the facility where the examination is performed; and
(iii) medical costs, including medical and dental care, including costs of medication."

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 and 2] are intended to be codified
as an integral part of Title 46, chapter 14, part 2, and the provisions of Title 46, chapter 14, part 2, apply to
[sections 1 and 2].

NEW SECTION. Section 6. Effective date. [This act] is effective October 1, 2025.
- END -
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 236